Texas, session 892, HB253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 61.003(6), Education Code, is amended to read as follows: (6)  "Other agency of higher education" means The University of Texas System, System Administration; The University of Texas at El Paso Museum; Texas Epidemic Public Health Institute at The University of Texas Health Science Center at Houston; The Texas A&M University System, Administrative and General Offices; Texas A&M AgriLife Research; Texas A&M AgriLife Extension Service; Rodent and Predatory Animal Control Service (a part of the Texas A&M AgriLife Extension Service); Institute for Animal Health Research and Response at Texas A&M University; Texas A&M Engineering Experiment Station (including the Texas A&M Transportation Institute); Texas A&M Engineering Extension Service; Texas A&M Forest Service; Texas Division of Emergency Management; Texas Tech University Museum; Texas State University System, System Administration; Sam Houston Memorial Museum; Panhandle-Plains Historical Museum; Cotton Research Committee of Texas; Texas Water Resources Institute; Texas A&M Veterinary Medical Diagnostic Laboratory; and any other unit, division, institution, or agency which shall be so designated by statute or which may be established to operate as a component part of any public senior college or university, or which may be so classified as provided in this chapter. SECTION 2.  Subchapter E, Chapter 86, Education Code, is amended by adding Section 86.83 to read as follows: Sec. 86.83.  INSTITUTE FOR ANIMAL HEALTH RESEARCH AND RESPONSE. (a) In this section: (1)  "Board" means the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System. (2)  "Institute" means the Institute for Animal Health Research and Response. (b)  The board shall establish and maintain the Institute for Animal Health Research and Response as a component of Texas A&M University. (c)  The institute is under the management and direction of the Texas A&M AgriLife Extension Service. (d)  The institute shall, in collaboration with the Parks and Wildlife Department and the Texas Animal Health Commission: (1)  study the progression of animal diseases and parasitic insects; (2)  analyze the genetic profiles of animals infected with diseases or parasitic insects; (3)  develop: (A)  strategies to prevent animal diseases and parasitic insect infestations; (B)  efforts to mitigate transmission of animal diseases and parasitic insect infestations; and (C)  treatments for animal diseases and parasitic insect infestations; and (4)  evaluate the implementation of strategies, mitigation efforts, and treatments developed under Subdivision (3). (e)  The institute may conduct an activity described by Subsection (d) at a location: (1)  in which an animal infected with an animal disease or parasitic insect infestation has been found; (2)  operated by the Parks and Wildlife Department; (3)  operated by the Texas Animal Health Commission; or (4)  operated by the institute. (f)  The institute may employ personnel. (g)  The institute may make plans and enter into contracts for the construction and use of necessary facilities. (h)  The institute may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source for the purposes of the institute. (i)  The institute may prioritize the study, analysis, and development of strategies, mitigation efforts, and treatments for animal diseases or parasitic insect infestations as the institute deems necessary. (j)  The board is required to implement a provision of this section only if the legislature appropriates money specifically for that purpose.  If the legislature does not appropriate money specifically for that purpose, the board may, but is not required to, implement the provision using other money available to the board for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.